Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Retirement System

47-2-20.
Creation of retirement system; purpose, management, corporate powers and privileges, and certain rights in actions at law of retirement system; name under which retirement system to transact business.

A retirement system is established and placed under the management of the board of trustees for the purpose of providing retirement allowances and other benefits under this chapter for employees of the state and political subdivisions thereof. It shall have the powers and privileges of a corporation and the right to bring and defend actions and to implead and be impleaded. It shall be known as the “Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia,” and by such name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds invested, and all of its cash and securities and other property held.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 2.

47-2-21.
Power and duty of board of trustees to administer and operate retirement system; membership of board; vacancies; expenses; oath; quorum.

The administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the retirement system and for effectuating this chapter are vested in the board of trustees, which shall be organized immediately after a majority of the trustees have qualified and taken the oath of office.

The board of trustees shall consist of seven trustees as follows:

The state auditor, ex officio;

The state treasurer, ex officio;

The commissioner of administrative services, ex officio;

One member appointed by the Governor for a term of four years, provided that the first such term was from date of appointment to June 30, 1951;

Two trustees elected by the trustees set forth in paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection for a term of four years, provided that in their first terms one served for a term from the date of election to June 30, 1950, and the other for a term from the date of election to June 30, 1952; provided, further, that each of these two members shall have had at least five years of creditable service with an agency included in this retirement system; and

In electing the two trustees identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the trustees set forth in paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection shall review and consider any individuals nominated by any organization of state retirees consisting of at least 1,000 members; and

The seventh trustee shall be a citizen of this state but not a member of the retirement system nor shall he or she hold or be a candidate for public office during his or her term of office as a trustee. He or she shall have had at least ten years of experience in the investment of moneys and shall be elected by the remaining trustees for a term of four years, provided that his or her first term was from the date of election to June 30, 1953.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a trustee, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment or election.

The trustees may receive the daily expense allowance authorized for members of the General Assembly for each day spent attending meetings of the board of trustees and any committee meetings called pursuant to authorization of the board of trustees and for time spent in necessary travel. In addition to such amount, the trustees shall be reimbursed for all actual travel and other expenses necessarily incurred through service on the board of trustees. State officials serving ex officio shall not receive the daily expense allowance but shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual expenses.

Each trustee shall, within ten days after his or her appointment or election, take an oath of office that he or she will diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the board of trustees which have been entrusted to him or her and that he or she will not knowingly violate or willingly permit to be violated any law applicable to the retirement system. The oath shall be subscribed to by the trustee, certified by the officer before whom it is taken, and filed immediately in the office of the Secretary of State.

Five trustees at any meeting of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum to transact business. Each trustee shall be entitled to one vote and four votes shall be necessary for a decision by the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1991, p. 274, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1690, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 4/HB 805; Ga. L. 2021, p. 655, § 1/HB 173.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in paragraph (b)(2).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “commissioner of administrative services” for “commissioner of personnel administration” in paragraph (b)(3); and inserted “or she” and “or her” throughout paragraph (b)(6) and subsection (e).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions of paragraph (b)(5) as subparagraph (b)(5)(A) and added subparagraph (b)(5)(B).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

47-2-22.
Election of chairperson and director; actuarial services; application of state system of personnel administration; payment of costs of personnel administration.

The board of trustees shall elect a chairperson from its membership and shall employ a director who shall not be a trustee.

The board of trustees shall engage such actuarial and other services as shall be required to transact the business of the retirement system.

The director and all other employees of the board of trustees shall be governed by such rules of position, classification, appointment, promotion, demotion, dismissal, transfer, qualification, compensation, seniority, privileges, tenure, and other employment standards as may now or hereafter be established under the state system of personnel administration provided for by Chapter 20 of Title 45, including the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Personnel Board.

The board of trustees shall pay its share of the administrative costs of operating the state system of personnel administration in the manner prescribed in Code Section 45-20-4.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 5/HB 805.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” at the end of subsection (c) and in the middle of subsection (d).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “chairperson” for “chairman” in subsection (a); substituted “state system of personnel administration provided for by Chapter 20 of Title 45, including the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Personnel Board” for “State Personnel Administration” in subsection (c); and substituted the present provisions of subsection (d) for the former provisions, which read: “The board of trustees shall pay its pro rata share of the administrative costs of operating the State Personnel Administration in the manner prescribed in paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Code Section 45-20-4.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

47-2-23.
Treasurer of the board of trustees; manner of payment of funds of the retirement system; surety bond for the treasurer.

There shall be a treasurer of the board of trustees, who shall be appointed by it and subject to its rules and regulations. He shall be the treasurer of the assets of the retirement system. Payments of the funds of the retirement system shall be made by the treasurer only upon vouchers signed by the treasurer and countersigned by one other person designated by the board of trustees. The treasurer of the board of trustees shall furnish to the board of trustees a surety bond of a company authorized to do business in this state in such an amount as shall be required by the board of trustees, provided that if the treasurer is a corporate trustee authorized to do business as such under the laws of this state, the trustees, in their discretion, may decide that no such bond be furnished. The premium on the surety bond shall be paid from the expense fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 7.

47-2-24.
Designation of medical board; duties.

The board of trustees shall designate a medical board of three physicians who are not eligible to participate in the retirement system. If required, other physicians may be employed to report on special cases. The medical board shall arrange for and pass upon all medical examinations required under this chapter and shall report in writing to the board of trustees its conclusions and recommendations upon all the matters referred to it.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 6.

47-2-25.
Legal adviser of the board of trustees.

The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser of the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 6; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” in the middle of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-26.
Designation of an actuary; duties of actuary; annual valuation of contingent assets and liabilities of the retirement system.

The board of trustees shall designate an actuary who shall be its technical adviser on matters regarding the operation of the funds created under this chapter and who shall perform such duties as are required in that regard.

At least every five years, the actuary shall conduct an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the retirement system and shall recommend for adoption by the board of trustees mortality, service, and other tables needed in the operation of the system. Taking into account the results of such investigations, the board of trustees shall from time to time adopt for the retirement system such mortality, service, and other tables as it shall deem necessary for use in all calculations required in connection with this retirement system. The board of trustees shall also determine from time to time the rate of regular interest to be used by the retirement system, which rate shall be limited to a minimum of 2 percent.

On the basis of the rate of regular interest and the tables last adopted by the board of trustees, the actuary shall make annual valuations of the contingent assets and liabilities of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 6; Ga. L. 1971, p. 418, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 637, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” in the middle of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-27.
Duty of board of trustees to keep data necessary for actuarial valuations; duty to keep records of proceedings; annual report.

The board of trustees shall keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for actuarial valuations of the various funds of the retirement system and for checking the experience of the retirement system.

The board of trustees shall keep a record of all of its proceedings, which record shall be open to public inspection. It shall publish annually a report showing the fiscal transactions of the retirement system for the preceding year, the amount of the accumulated cash and securities of the retirement system, and the last balance sheet showing the financial condition of the retirement system by means of an actuarial valuation of the contingent assets and liabilities of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 6.

47-2-28.
Simplified tables for estimation of retirement allowances; effect on existing rights and benefits; formula for calculating service retirement allowances.

On and after April 1, 1964, the board of trustees is authorized to adopt simplified benefit tables which will enable a member to estimate his or her retirement allowances. Such tables shall (1) be based on an actuarial study, (2) maintain the actuarial soundness of the retirement system, (3) for those members retiring on and after April 1, 1968, be applied to the member’s highest average monthly earnable compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while a member of the retirement system, and (4) be applicable to all members, provided that the application of such tables shall not reduce or impair the amount of any allowances or benefits to which any person who was a member on April 1, 1964, would have been entitled at that time or would be entitled at any time thereafter under tables or calculations which were in effect at that time or at any time prior thereto or at any time prior to the adoption of such simplified benefit tables.

The regular service retirement allowance payable to a member pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, prior to the application of any minimum benefit formula otherwise provided under this chapter, shall be determined pursuant to the formula adopted from time to time by the board of trustees for such purpose. Such formula shall be uniformly applicable to all members similarly situated. The board of trustees may establish rules and administrative procedures uniformly applicable to all members similarly situated relating to the calculation of such service retirement allowance.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 6; Ga. L. 1959, p. 107, § 6; Ga. L. 1964, p. 119, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1356, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1104, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 5/HB 460; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 4/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsection (a), which read: “Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of trustees, for the purpose of administering the social security program, may, with due regard for the actuarial soundness of the retirement system and after an actuarial investigation into its benefit structure, adopt such tables, calculations, and compensation and deduction schedules as it shall deem desirable in connection with the proper operation of the retirement system. All tables, calculations, and compensation and deduction schedules adopted under this Code section shall be based on final monthly earnings, which shall mean monthly earnable compensation as reflected by monthly contributions during employment, except that no salary increase by adjustment in compensation in any manner during the last 12 months, which increase is in excess of 10 percent, shall be included. Such tables and calculations as may be adopted shall not diminish or impair the amount of any allowances or benefits which would have been payable to the member by use of tables or calculations that were in effect on January 1, 1959. The board of trustees may also, from time to time, establish rules and regulations for the administration of the funds created under this chapter and for the transaction of its business.”; and redesignated former subsections (b) and (c) as present subsections (a) and (b), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-29.
Postretirement benefit adjustments.

On a date to be established by the board of trustees, but not before April 1, 1967, the board of trustees is authorized to adopt a method of providing for postretirement benefit adjustments for the purpose of maintaining essentially no less purchasing power for a beneficiary in his postretirement years. Such method shall be based upon:

Recommendation of the actuary for the board of trustees;

Maintaining the actuarial soundness of the retirement system;

Its application to the retirement income of members retiring on or after the adoption of such method by the board of trustees; and

Any additional contribution by the member in an amount not to exceed one-fourth of 1 percent of his monthly earnable compensation.

This Code section shall also be applicable to those members retiring before April 1, 1967.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, no member who becomes a member of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2009, shall be entitled to receive any postretirement benefit adjustment.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 751, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1356, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 339, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1482, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 320, § 2/HB 452; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 5/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added subsection (c).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsection (b), which read: “(b)(1) Effective July 1, 1988, the monthly retirement benefit of each beneficiary who was receiving a benefit on July 1, 1981, shall be increased by:

“(A) One dollar for each full year of creditable service, other than creditable service based on forfeited annual and sick leave and creditable service resulting from any projection of service under the provisions of this chapter, which the member had at the time of retirement; plus

“(B) One dollar for each full year which has elapsed from the date of retirement until July 1, 1981,

“provided that, if a beneficiary is receiving a monthly benefit exceeding $1,500.00 on July 1, 1988, no increase shall be granted to such beneficiary under this paragraph nor shall any portion of such increase be granted to a beneficiary which would cause such beneficiary’s total monthly benefit as of July 1, 1988, to exceed $1,500.00.

“(2) When the postretirement benefit adjustment provided by this subsection has been granted, there shall be no further postretirement benefit adjustments pursuant to the authority of this subsection.”; and redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 320, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly is desirous of providing an established annual cost-of-living adjustment to all current active and retired members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and the Georgia Judicial Retirement System. In order to do so, limiting future liability of the systems by adjusting the retirement expectations of persons who are newly employed is a regrettable but necessary step toward fiscal soundness.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-30.
Deposits of cash available for disbursements for benefits and other payments.

For the purpose of meeting disbursements for pensions, annuities, and other payments, cash may be kept available on deposit in one or more banks or trust companies organized under the laws of this state or of the United States, provided that the sum on deposit in any one bank or trust company shall not exceed 25 percent of the paid up capital and surplus of each bank or trust company; and provided, further, that each bank or trust company shall either give a depository bond in an amount sufficient to cover the deposits or place in trust a sufficient amount of federal or state securities to cover the deposits.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 7.

47-2-31.
Investment powers; power to employ agents as investment advisers and to make investments.

The board of trustees shall be the trustees of the funds and shall have full power to invest and reinvest the assets of the retirement system and to purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any securities and other investments in which assets of the retirement system have been invested, any proceeds of any investments, and any money belonging to the retirement system; provided, however, that such power shall be subject to all terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.”

The board of trustees is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments, and to contract with such agents for their services as investment advisers and counselors who will make recommendations for investments and make investments, if the board of trustees so authorizes.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 7; Ga. L. 1963, p. 546, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1356, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 6/HB 460; Ga. L. 2006, p. 93, § 1/SB 466.

47-2-32.
Personal interest in gains or profits from investments made by the board of trustees; unauthorized use of assets of the retirement system.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no trustee or employee of the board of trustees shall have any personal interest in the gains or profits from any investment made by it or use in any manner, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent, the assets of the retirement system, except to make such payments as are authorized by the board of trustees in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 7.

47-2-33.
Plan year designated.

For purposes of complying with federal Internal Revenue Service rules and regulations, the plan year for this retirement system shall be the 12 month period beginning on July 1 of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 13/HB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.